Maine, session 132, LD1690.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §1014, sub-§4, as amended by IB 2015, c. 1, §4, is further
amended to read:
4. Enforcement. A violation of this section may result in a civil penalty of no more
than 100% of the amount of the expenditure in violation, except that a violation of
subsection 5-B may result in a penalty of no more than 500% of the amount of the
expenditure in violation and except that an expenditure for yard signs lacking the required
information may result in a maximum civil penalty of $200. In assessing a civil penalty,
the commission shall consider, among other things, how widely the communication was
disseminated, whether the violation was intentional, whether the violation occurred as the
result of an error by a printer or other paid vendor and whether the communication conceals
or misrepresents the identity of the person who financed it. If the person who financed the
communication or who committed the violation corrects the violation within 10 days after
receiving notification of the violation from the commission by adding the missing
information to the communication, the commission may decide to assess no civil penalty,
except for violations of subsection 5-B.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §1014, sub-§5-B is enacted to read:
5-B. Use of synthetic media in political communications. A person or an entity
required to provide a disclosure under this section shall disclose, as part of the required
disclosure, when an image, audio or video used in a communication has been materially
manipulated or altered and the communication contains synthetic media. The disclosure
must include the words "THIS COMMUNICATION CONTAINS AUDIO, VIDEO
AND/OR IMAGES THAT HAVE BEEN MANIPULATED OR ALTERED."
The commission shall establish by routine technical rule, adopted in accordance with Title
5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A, criteria regarding size and placement of the disclosure
required under this subsection.
A. For purposes of this subsection, "deceptive or fraudulent political communication"
means synthetic media that depicts a candidate or political party with the intent to injure
the reputation of the candidate or political party or otherwise deceive a voter and that:
(1) Appears to a reasonable person to depict a real individual saying or doing
something that did not actually occur; or
(2) Provides a reasonable person a materially different understanding or impression
of the appearance, action or speech than a reasonable person would have from an
unaltered, original version of an image, audio recording or video recording.
B. For purposes of this subsection, "synthetic media" means an image, an audio
recording or a video recording of an individual's appearance, speech or conduct that
has been created or intentionally manipulated with the use of digital technology or in
any other manner to create a materially deceptive or fraudulent political
communication.
C. This subsection does not apply to:
(1) A radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite
television operator, programmer or producer, that broadcasts synthetic media as
part of a bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary or on-the-spot
Page 1 - 132LR0111(01)

414 coverage of a bona fide news event, if the broadcast clearly acknowledges through
425 content or a disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or read by the average
436 listener or viewer, that there are questions about the authenticity of the synthetic
447 media or in cases where federal law requires broadcasters to air advertisements
458 from legally qualified candidates as defined by 47 Code of Federal Regulations,
469 Section 73.1940 (2022);
(2) A radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite
television operator, programmer or producer, when it is paid to broadcast synthetic
media and has made a good faith effort to establish the depiction is not a deceptive
or fraudulent political communication or in cases where federal law requires
broadcasters to air advertisements from legally qualified candidates as defined by
47 Code of Federal Regulations, Section 73.1940 (2022);
(3) A website or a regularly published newspaper, magazine or other periodical of
general circulation, including an Internet or electronic publication, that routinely
carries news and commentary of general interest and that publishes a deceptive or
fraudulent political communication, if the publication clearly states that the
deceptive or fraudulent political communication does not accurately represent the
speech or conduct of the candidate; and
(4) Materially deceptive audio or visual media that constitutes satire or parody.
D. In addition to any other remedy that may be available, the commission may bring a
civil action in the Superior Court for injunctive or other appropriate equitable relief in
order to prohibit the dissemination of synthetic media in violation of this subsection.
If the court finds a violation of this subsection, the court may award to the commission
the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney's fees as determined by the
court.